.vale/styles/RedHat/config/dictionaries/en_US-RedHat.aff
SET UTF-8

# Plural/third person -s
SFX S Y 4
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzhy]

# -ize suffix
SFX Z Y 1
SFX Z   0     ize        .

# Past tense -ed
SFX D Y 5
SFX D   e     ed         e
SFX D   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX D   0     ed         [aeiou]y
SFX D   0     ed         [^ey]

# Combine -ize with -ed and -s
SFX Z Y 3
SFX Z   0     ize        .
SFX Z   0     izes       .
SFX Z   0     ized       .
